Utah statutes.
78B-3-305.   Transitory actions -- Residence of corporations.

(1)  All transitory causes of action arising outside the state, except those mentioned in Section 78B-3-306, shall, if action is brought in this state, be brought and tried in the county where any defendant resides.

(2)  If any such defendant is a corporation, the action may be brought and tried in any county in which the corporation has an office or place of business.

